lt-LT: „sekti Events specializacija: Krosas; Šuolis į aukštį; Barjerinis bėgimas; Ilgosios distancijos (3000–10000 m); Šuolis į tolį / trišuolis; Vidutinės distancijos (800–1500 m); Daugiakovė; Šuolis su kartimi; Sprintas (60–400 m); Metimai; Kita
sl-SI: Specializacija za tekaške atletske discipline: Kros; Skok v višino; Tek čez ovire; Dolge proge (3000–10000 m); Skok v daljino/troskok; Srednje proge (800–1500 m); Mnogoboj; Skok s palico; Šprint (60–400 m); Meti; Drugo
es: Especialización de evento atlético: Campo a través; Salto de altura; Carrera de vallas; Larga distancia (3000-10000 m); Salto de longitud/triple; Media distancia (800-1500 m); Eventos múltiples; Salto con pértiga; Velocidad (60-400 m); Lanzamientos; Otro
hr-HR: Specijalizacija događaja na stazi: Kros; Skok u vis; Prepone; Duge pruge (3000 – 10000 m); Skok u dalj / troskok; Srednje pruge (800 – 1500 m); Višeboj; Skok s motkom; Sprint (60 – 400 m); Bacanja; Ostalo
bg-BG: Специализация за конкретна лекоатлетическа дисциплина на писта: Крос кънтри; Скок на височина; Бягане с препятствия; Бягане на дълги разстояния (3000 – 10000 m); Скок на дължина/троен скок; Бягане на средни разстояния (800 – 1500 m); Многобой; Овчарски скок; Спринт (60 – 400 m); Хвърляния; Друго
de: Spezialisierung auf Laufdisziplinen: Crosslauf; Hochsprung; Hürdenlauf; Langstrecke (3000-10.000 m); Weit-/Dreisprung; Mittelstrecke (800-1500 m); Mehrkampf; Stabhochsprung; Sprint (60-400 m); Wurfdisziplinen; Sonstiges
en: Track event specialization: Cross-country; High jump; Hurdles; Long distance (3000-10000 m); Long/triple jump; Middle distance (800-1500 m); Multi-event; Pole vault; Sprint (60-400 m); Throws; Other
ja: トラック競技種目: クロスカントリー; 走高跳; ハードル; 長距離 (3000〜10000 m); 走幅跳 / 三段跳; 中距離 (800〜1500 m); 混成競技; 棒高跳; 短距離 (60〜400 m); 投てき; その他
da: Specialisering for banedisciplin: Terrænløb; Højdespring; Hækkeløb; Langdistance (3000-10000 m); Længde-/trespring; Mellemdistance (800-1500 m); Mangekamp; Stangspring; Sprint (60-400 m); Kast; Andet
ro-RO: Specializare pentru proba de atletism pe pistă: Cros; Săritura în înălțime; Garduri; Distanță lungă (3000-10000 m); Săritura în lungime/triplusalt; Distanță medie (800-1500 m); Probe multiple; Săritura cu prăjina; Sprint (60-400 m); Aruncări; Altele
el: Εξειδίκευση αγωνίσματος στίβου: Ανώμαλος δρόμος; Άλμα εις ύψος; Δρόμος με εμπόδια; Μεγάλες αποστάσεις (3000-10000 m); Άλμα εις μήκος / τριπλούν; Μεσαίες αποστάσεις (800-1500 m); Σύνθετα αγωνίσματα; Άλμα επί κοντώ; Αγώνες ταχύτητας (60-400 m); Ρίψεις; Άλλο
nl: Baanonderdeel specialisatie: Veldlopen; Hoogspringen; Hordelopen; Lange afstand (3000-10000 m); Ver-/hink-stap-springen; Middellange afstand (800-1500 m); Meerkamp; Polsstokhoogspringen; Sprint (60-400 m); Werpen; Overig
it: Specializzazione della gara su pista: Corsa campestre; Salto in alto; Ostacoli; Fondo (3000-10000 m); Salto in lungo/triplo; Mezzofondo (800-1500 m); Prove multiple; Salto con l'asta; Velocità (60-400 m); Lanci; Altro
zh-CN: 田径项目专项类型: 越野跑; 跳高; 跨栏; 长跑（3000-10000 米）; 跳远/三级跳; 中距离跑（800-1500 米）; 多项目; 撑杆跳; 短跑（60-400 米）; 投掷类; 其他
pt-PT: Especialização em prova de pista: Corta-mato; Salto em altura; Barreiras; Fundo (3000-10000 m); Salto em comprimento/triplo salto; Meio-fundo (800-1500 m); Provas combinadas; Salto com vara; Velocidade (60-400 m); Lançamentos; Outro
hu: követés Events szakirány: Mezei futás; Magasugrás; Gátfutás; Hosszútávfutás (3000-10000 m); Távolugrás/Hármasugrás; Középtávfutás (800-1500 m); Összetett verseny; Rúdugrás; Sprint (60-400 m); Dobások; Egyéb
sv: Specialisering inom friidrottsgren: Terränglöpning; Höjdhopp; Häcklöpning; Långdistans (3000–10000 m); Längdhopp/tresteg; Medeldistans (800–1500 m); Mångkamp; Stavhopp; Sprint (60–400 m); Kastgrenar; Övrigt
tr: Pist branşı uzmanlığı: Kros; Yüksek atlama; Engelli koşu; Uzun mesafe (3000-10000 m); Uzun/üç adım atlama; Orta mesafe (800-1500 m); Çoklu branş; Sırıkla atlama; Sprint (60-400 m); Atışlar; Diğer
ru: Специализация легкоатлетического вида: Кросс; Прыжки в высоту; Бег с барьерами; Бег на длинные дистанции (3000-10000 м); Прыжки в длину / тройной прыжок; Бег на средние дистанции (800-1500 м); Многоборье; Прыжки с шестом; Спринт (60-400 м); Метания; Другое
pt-BR: Evento de pista especialização: Cross-country; Salto em altura; Barreiras; Fundo (3000-10000 m); Salto em distância/triplo; Meio-fundo (800-1500 m); Provas combinadas; Salto com vara; Velocidade (60-400 m); Arremessos e lançamentos; Outro
pl: Docelowa konkurencja biegowa: Biegi przełajowe; Skok wzwyż; Biegi przez płotki; Biegi długodystansowe (3000–10 000 m); Skok w dal / trójskok; Biegi średniodystansowe (800–1500 m); Wieloboje; Skok o tyczce; Sprint (60–400 m); Rzuty; Inne
th: ความเชี่ยวชาญเฉพาะด้านของ Event ติดตาม: วิ่งข้ามทุ่ง; กระโดดสูง; วิ่งข้ามรั้ว; วิ่งระยะไกล (3000-10000 ม.); กระโดดไกล/เขย่งก้าวกระโดด; วิ่งระยะกลาง (800-1500 ม.); กรีฑารวม; กระโดดค้ำ; วิ่งระยะสั้น (60-400 ม.); ทุ่ม/ขว้าง/พุ่ง; อื่นๆ
cs: Specializace na běžeckou disciplínu: Přespolní běh; Skok do výšky; Překážkový běh; Dlouhé tratě (3000–10000 m); Skok do dálky / trojskok; Střední tratě (800–1500 m); Víceboj; Skok o tyči; Sprint (60–400 m); Vrhy a hody; Jiné
fr: Spécialisation par épreuve d’athlétisme: Cross-country; Saut en hauteur; Haies; Longue distance (3 000-10 000 m); Saut en longueur/triple saut; Demi-fond (800-1 500 m); Épreuves multiples; Saut à la perche; Sprint (60-400 m); Lancers; Autre
fi: Ratatapahtuman määritys: Maastojuoksu; Korkeushyppy; Aitajuoksu; Pitkän matkan juoksu (3000–10 000 m); Pituushyppy/kolmiloikka; Keskipitkän matkan juoksu (800–1500 m); Moniottelu; Seiväshyppy; Pikajuoksu (60–400 m); Heitot; Muu
vi: Chuyên môn hóa nội dung thi đấu điền kinh: Chạy việt dã; Nhảy cao; Chạy vượt rào; Chạy cự ly dài (3000-10000 m); Nhảy xa/nhảy ba bước; Chạy cự ly trung bình (800-1500 m); Đa môn phối hợp; Nhảy sào; Chạy nước rút (60-400 m); Các môn ném; Khác
ko: 트랙 경기 특화 종목: 크로스컨트리; 높이뛰기; 허들; 장거리(3000-10000m); 멀리뛰기/세단뛰기; 중거리(800-1500m); 다종목 경기; 장대높이뛰기; 단거리(60-400m); 투척 경기; 기타
nb: Spesialisering i baneøvelse: Terrengløp; Høydehopp; Hekkeløp; Langdistanse (3000–10000 m); Lengdehopp/tresteg; Mellomdistanse (800–1500 m); Mangekamp; Stavsprang; Sprint (60–400 m); Kast; Annet
sk-SK: Špecializácia na atletické disciplíny: Cezpoľný beh; Skok do výšky; Prekážkový beh; Dlhé trate (3 000–10 000 m); Skok do diaľky/trojskok; Stredné trate (800–1 500 m); Viacboj; Skok o žrdi; Šprint (60–400 m); Vrhy a hody; Iné
zh-TW: 田徑賽事專項: 越野跑; 跳高; 跨欄; 長跑 (3000-10000 公尺); 跳遠/三級跳遠; 中長跑 (800-1500 公尺); 全能項目; 撐竿跳; 短跑 (60-400 公尺); 投擲項目; 其他